Maryland, session 2026, HB1614.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–301.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, the
court costs in a traffic case, including parking and impounding cases, cases under §
21–202.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1404.1, § 21–1414, or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation
Article in which costs are imposed, and cases under § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article
in which costs are imposed:

HOUSE BILL 1614 3
(i) Are $22.50; and
(ii) Shall also be applicable to those cases in which the defendant
elects to waive the defendant’s right to trial and pay the fine or penalty deposit established
by the Chief Judge of the District Court by administrative regulation.
(2) In an uncontested case under § 21–202.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, §
21–1404.1, § 21–1414, or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation Article, an uncontested case
under § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article, or an uncontested parking or impounding case
in which the fines are paid directly to a political subdivision or municipality, costs are $2.00,
which costs shall be paid to and retained by the political subdivision or municipality.
7–302.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) through (g) of this section, the clerks of
the District Court shall:
(1) Collect costs, fines, forfeitures, or penalties imposed by the court; and
(2) Remit them to the State under a system agreed upon by the Chief Judge
of the District Court and the Comptroller.
(e) (2) (iii) A citation issued as the result of any of the following systems or
cameras controlled by a State agency shall provide that, in an uncontested or contested
case, the penalty shall be paid directly to the District Court:
1. A traffic control signal monitoring system;
2. A work zone speed control system;
3. A speed monitoring system; [or]
4. A bus lane monitoring system; OR
5. A LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL
MONITORING SYSTEM.
(3) (iii) Civil penalties resulting from citations issued using a speed
monitoring system OR A LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING
SYSTEM controlled by the Maryland Transportation Authority that are collected by the
District Court shall be collected in accordance with subsection (a) of this section and
remitted to the Maryland Transportation Authority.
10–311.

HOUSE BILL 1614
(a) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a traffic control signal
monitoring system in accordance with § 21–202.1 of the Transportation Article is
admissible in a proceeding concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a
violation of § 21–202(h) of the Transportation Article without authentication.
(b) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a speed monitoring system
in accordance with § 21–809 or § 21–810 of the Transportation Article is admissible in a
proceeding concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a violation of Title 21,
Subtitle 8 of the Transportation Article without authentication.
(c) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a school bus monitoring
camera in accordance with § 21–706.1 of the Transportation Article is admissible in a
proceeding concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a violation of § 21–706
of the Transportation Article without authentication.
(d) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a vehicle height monitoring
system in accordance with § 24–111.3 of the Transportation Article is admissible in a
proceeding concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a violation of a State or
local law restricting the presence of certain vehicles during certain times without
authentication.
(e) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a bus lane monitoring system
in accordance with § 21–1134 of the Transportation Article is admissible in a proceeding
concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a violation of § 21–1133 of the
Transportation Article without authentication.
(f) A recorded image of a motor vehicle and any relevant recorded audio produced
by a noise abatement monitoring system in conjunction with a noise measuring device in
accordance with § 22–612 of the Transportation Article is admissible in a proceeding
concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a violation of § 22–602 of the
Transportation Article without authentication.
(g) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a stop sign monitoring system
in accordance with § 21–707.1 of the Transportation Article is admissible in a proceeding
concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a violation of § 21–707 of the
Transportation Article without authentication.
(h) A RECORDED IMAGE OF A MOTOR VEHICLE PRODUCED BY A LANE
DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
21–1404.1 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE IS ADMISSIBLE IN A PROCEEDING
CONCERNING A CIVIL CITATION ISSUED UNDER THAT SECTION FOR A VIOLATION OF
§ 21–204.1 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE WITHOUT AUTHENTICATION.
(I) In any other judicial proceeding, a recorded image produced by a vehicle
height monitoring system, traffic control signal monitoring system, speed monitoring
system, work zone speed control system, stop sign monitoring system, school bus

HOUSE BILL 1614 5
monitoring camera, or bus lane monitoring system or a recorded image and any relevant
recorded audio produced by a noise abatement monitoring system in conjunction with a
noise measuring device is admissible as otherwise provided by law.
Article – General Provisions
4–321.
(a) In this section, “recorded image” or “recorded images” has the meaning stated
in § 21–202.1, § 21–706.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1134, § 21–1404.1, § 22–612, or §
24–111.3 of the Transportation Article.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a custodian shall deny
inspection of recorded images produced by:
(1) a traffic control signal monitoring system operated under § 21–202.1 of
the Transportation Article;
(2) an automated railroad grade crossing enforcement system operated
under § 21–704.1 of the Transportation Article;
(3) a school bus monitoring camera operated under § 21–706.1 of the
Transportation Article;
(4) a stop sign monitoring system operated under § 21–707.1 of the
Transportation Article;
(5) a speed monitoring system operated under § 21–809 of the
Transportation Article;
(6) a work zone speed control system operated under § 21–810 of the
Transportation Article;
(7) a bus lane monitoring system operated under § 21–1134 of the
Transportation Article;
(8) A LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM
OPERATED UNDER § 21–1404.1 OF THE TRANSPORTATION ARTICLE;
(9) a noise abatement monitoring system operated under § 22–612 of the
Transportation Article; or
[(9)] (10) a vehicle height monitoring system operated under § 24–111.3 of
the Transportation Article.
(c) A custodian shall allow inspection of recorded images:

HOUSE BILL 1614
(1) as required in § 12–113.1, § 21–202.1, § 21–704.1, § 21–706.1, §
21–707.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1134, § 21–1404.1, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3 of the
Transportation Article;
(2) by any person issued a citation under § 21–202.1, § 21–704.1, §
21–706.1, § 21–707.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1134, § 21–1404.1, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3
of the Transportation Article, or by an attorney of record for the person; or
(3) by an employee or agent of an agency in an investigation or a proceeding
relating to the imposition of or indemnification from civil liability under § 21–202.1, §
21–704.1, § 21–706.1, § 21–707.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1134, § 21–1404.1, § 22–612,
or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation Article.
Article – Insurance
11–215.
(e) For purposes of reclassifying an insured in a classification that entails a
higher premium, an insurer under an automobile insurance policy may not consider a
probation before judgment disposition of a motor vehicle law offense, a civil penalty imposed
pursuant to § 21–202.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1404.1, or § 24–111.3 of the
Transportation Article, or a first offense of driving with an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or
more under § 16–205.1 of the Transportation Article on record with the Motor Vehicle
Administration, as provided in § 16–117(b) of the Transportation Article.
11–318.
(e) For purposes of reclassifying an insured in a classification that entails a
higher premium, an insurer under an automobile insurance policy may not consider a
probation before judgment disposition of a motor vehicle law offense, a civil penalty imposed
pursuant to § 21–202.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1404.1, or § 24–111.3 of the
Transportation Article, or a first offense of driving with an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or
more under § 16–205.1 of the Transportation Article on record with the Motor Vehicle
Administration, as provided in § 16–117(b) of the Transportation Article.
Article – Transportation
12–113.1.
(b) This section applies to:
(1) Traffic control signal monitoring systems under § 21–202.1 of this
article;
(2) Automated railroad grade crossing enforcement systems under §
21–704.1 of this article;

HOUSE BILL 1614 7
(3) School bus monitoring cameras under § 21–706.1 of this article;
(4) Stop sign monitoring systems under § 21–707.1 of this article;
(5) Speed monitoring systems under § 21–809 of this article;
(6) Work zone speed control systems under § 21–810 of this article;
(7) Bus lane monitoring systems under § 21–1134 of this article;
(8) LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEMS
UNDER § 21–1404.1 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(9) Noise abatement monitoring systems under § 22–612 of this article;
[(9)] (10) Vehicle height monitoring systems under § 24–111.3 of this
article; and
[(10)] (11) Any other automated traffic enforcement system authorized
under State law.
(c) (1) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, an
agency may not access or use a recorded image or associated data without a warrant,
subpoena, or court order unless the access or use is for an appropriate traffic enforcement
purpose.
21–204.1.
Where lane direction USE control signals are placed over the individual lanes of a
highway, vehicular traffic may travel in any lane over which a green signal is shown, but
may not enter or travel in any lane over which a red signal is shown.
21–1401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Approach” means any roadway, overhead structure, ramp, bridge, causeway,
entrance, and exit provided as a means of access to or departure from an Authority
highway.
(c) “Authority highway” means:
(1) Each highway, tunnel, and bridge within the jurisdiction of the
Maryland Transportation Authority; and

HOUSE BILL 1614
(2) Each approach to these highways, tunnels, and bridges.
21–1404.1.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CHESAPEAKE BAY BRIDGE” MEANS THE WILLIAM PRESTON
LANE, JR., MEMORIAL CHESAPEAKE BAY BRIDGE, THE PARALLEL CHESAPEAKE
BAY BRIDGE, AND ANY APPROACHES TO THE BRIDGES.
(3) (2) “LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING
SYSTEM” MEANS A DEVICE THAT HAS ONE OR MORE MOTOR VEHICLE SENSORS
CONNECTED TO A CAMERA SYSTEM CAPABLE OF PRODUCING RECORDED IMAGES OF
MOTOR VEHICLES BEING USED IN THE COMMISSION OF A VIOLATION.
(4) (3) “LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING
SYSTEM OPERATOR” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS BEEN TRAINED AND
CERTIFIED TO OPERATE A LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING
SYSTEM.
(5) (4) (I) “OWNER” MEANS THE REGISTERED OWNER OF A
MOTOR VEHICLE OR A LESSEE OF A MOTOR VEHICLE UNDER A LEASE OF 6 MONTHS
OR LONGER.
(II) “OWNER” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. A MOTOR VEHICLE RENTAL OR LEASING COMPANY;
OR
2. A HOLDER OF A SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE
ISSUED UNDER TITLE 13, SUBTITLE 9, PART III OF THIS ARTICLE.
(6) (5) “RECORDED IMAGE” MEANS AN IMAGE RECORDED BY A
LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM:
(I) ON:
1. A PHOTOGRAPH;
2. A MICROPHOTOGRAPH;
3. AN ELECTRONIC IMAGE;

HOUSE BILL 1614 9
4. VIDEOTAPE; OR
5. ANY OTHER MEDIUM; AND
(II) SHOWING:
1. THE REAR OF A MOTOR VEHICLE; AND
2. ON AT LEAST ONE IMAGE OR PORTION OF TAPE, A
CLEAR AND LEGIBLE IDENTIFICATION OF THE ENTIRE REGISTRATION PLATE
NUMBER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE.
(7) (6) “VIOLATION” MEANS A VIOLATION OF § 21–204.1 OF THIS
TITLE FOR ENTERING OR TRAVELING IN A LANE OVER WHICH A RED LANE
DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL IS SHOWN.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO THE CHESAPEAKE BAY BRIDGE AN
AUTHORITY HIGHWAY.
(C) (1) THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY POLICE FORCE
MAY USE A LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM THAT
MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SUBSECTION TO RECORD THE IMAGES OF
MOTOR VEHICLES BEING USED IN THE COMMISSION OF A VIOLATION.
(2) (I) A LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING
SYSTEM MAY BE USED ONLY IF, IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE MARYLAND MANUAL ON
UNIFORM TRAFFIC CONTROL DEVICES, A CONSPICUOUS ROAD SIGN IS PLACED AT
A REASONABLE DISTANCE CONSISTENT WITH NATIONAL GUIDELINES BEFORE THE
LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM ALERTING DRIVERS
THAT A LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM MAY BE IN
OPERATION ON THE CHESAPEAKE BAY BRIDGE AN AUTHORITY HIGHWAY.
(II) BEFORE ACTIVATING A LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL
SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM, THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY
SHALL PROMINENTLY PUBLISH NOTICE OF THE IMPLEMENTATION AND USE OF THE
LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM ON ITS WEBSITE.
(III) MULTIPLE LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL
MONITORING SYSTEMS MAY BE IMPLEMENTED AND USED AT THE SAME TIME IN THE
SAME DIRECTION ON THE CHESAPEAKE BAY BRIDGE AN AUTHORITY HIGHWAY.

HOUSE BILL 1614
(3) (I) A LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING
SYSTEM OPERATOR SHALL COMPLETE TRAINING BY THE MANUFACTURER OF THE
LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM IN THE PROCEDURES
FOR SETTING UP, TESTING, AND OPERATING LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL
MONITORING SYSTEMS.
(II) ON COMPLETION OF THE TRAINING, THE MANUFACTURER
SHALL ISSUE A SIGNED CERTIFICATE TO THE LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL
SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR.
(III) THE CERTIFICATE OF TRAINING SHALL BE ADMITTED AS
EVIDENCE IN ANY COURT PROCEEDING FOR A VIOLATION.
(4) A LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM
OPERATOR SHALL FILL OUT AND SIGN A DAILY SET–UP LOG FOR A LANE DIRECTION
USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM THAT:
(I) STATES THE DATE AND TIME WHEN AND THE LOCATION
WHERE THE LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM WAS SET
UP;
(II) STATES THAT THE LANE DIRECTION CONTROL SIGNAL
MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR SUCCESSFULLY PERFORMED, AND THE DEVICE
PASSED, THE MANUFACTURER–SPECIFIED SELF–TESTS OF THE LANE DIRECTION
CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM BEFORE PRODUCING A RECORDED IMAGE;
(III) SHALL BE KEPT ON FILE; AND
(IV) (III) SHALL BE ADMITTED AS EVIDENCE IN ANY COURT
PROCEEDING FOR A VIOLATION.
(5) (I) A LANE DIRECTION CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM
SHALL UNDERGO AN ANNUAL CALIBRATION CHECK PERFORMED BY AN
INDEPENDENT CALIBRATION LABORATORY.
(II) THE INDEPENDENT CALIBRATION LABORATORY SHALL
ISSUE A SIGNED CERTIFICATE OF CALIBRATION AFTER THE ANNUAL CALIBRATION
CHECK THAT:
1. SHALL BE KEPT ON FILE; AND
2. SHALL BE ADMITTED AS EVIDENCE IN ANY COURT
PROCEEDING FOR A VIOLATION.

HOUSE BILL 1614 11
(D) (1) UNLESS THE DRIVER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE RECEIVED A
CITATION FROM A MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY POLICE OFFICER OR
ANOTHER POLICE OFFICER AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION, THE OWNER OR, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (G)(4) OF THIS SECTION, THE DRIVER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY IF AN IMAGE OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE IS
RECORDED BY A LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM IN
ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION BEING USED IN THE
COMMISSION OF A VIOLATION.
(2) A CIVIL PENALTY UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IS:
(I) FOR A FIRST VIOLATION OCCURRING ON A SINGLE TRIP
TRAVELING IN ONE DIRECTION, $90;
(II) FOR A SECOND VIOLATION OCCURRING ON THE SAME TRIP
WHILE TRAVELING IN THE SAME DIRECTION AS THE FIRST VIOLATION, $180; AND
(III) FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION OCCURRING ON
THE SAME TRIP WHILE TRAVELING IN THE SAME DIRECTION AS THE SECOND, THIRD,
OR SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION, $270.
(3) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL:
(I) PRESCRIBE A UNIFORM CITATION FORM CONSISTENT WITH
SUBSECTION (E)(1) OF THIS SECTION AND § 7–302 OF THE COURTS ARTICLE; AND
(II) INDICATE ON THE CITATION THE AMOUNT OF THE CIVIL
PENALTY TO BE PAID BY PERSONS WHO CHOOSE TO PREPAY THE CIVIL PENALTY
WITHOUT APPEARING IN DISTRICT COURT.
(E) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) THROUGH (5) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY POLICE FORCE OR
ITS CONTRACTOR SHALL MAIL TO THE OWNER ALLEGED TO BE LIABLE UNDER
SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION A CITATION THAT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE REGISTERED OWNER OF
THE VEHICLE;
(II) THE REGISTRATION NUMBER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE
INVOLVED IN THE ALLEGED VIOLATION;
(III) THE VIOLATION CHARGED;

HOUSE BILL 1614
(IV) THE LOCATION WHERE THE ALLEGED VIOLATION
OCCURRED;
(V) THE DATE AND TIME OF THE ALLEGED VIOLATION;
(VI) AT LEAST ONE RECORDED IMAGE OF THE VEHICLE WITH A
DATA BAR IMPRINTED ON EACH IMAGE THAT SHOWS THE MOTOR VEHICLE BEING
USED IN THE COMMISSION OF A VIOLATION AND THE DATE AND TIME THE IMAGE WAS
RECORDED;
(VII) THE AMOUNT OF THE CIVIL PENALTY IMPOSED AND THE
DATE BY WHICH THE CIVIL PENALTY SHOULD BE PAID;
(VIII) A SIGNED STATEMENT BY A MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION
AUTHORITY POLICE OFFICER REPRESENTATIVE OR CONTRACTOR THAT, BASED ON
INSPECTION OF RECORDED IMAGES, THE MOTOR VEHICLE WAS BEING USED IN THE
COMMISSION OF A VIOLATION;
(IX) A STATEMENT THAT RECORDED IMAGES ARE EVIDENCE OF
A VIOLATION;
(X) INFORMATION ADVISING THE PERSON ALLEGED TO BE
LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION OF THE MANNER AND TIME IN WHICH LIABILITY AS
ALLEGED IN THE CITATION MAY BE CONTESTED IN THE DISTRICT COURT; AND
(XI) INFORMATION ADVISING THE PERSON ALLEGED TO BE
LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION THAT FAILURE TO PAY THE CIVIL PENALTY OR TO
CONTEST LIABILITY IN A TIMELY MANNER:
1. IS AN ADMISSION OF LIABILITY;
2. MAY RESULT IN THE REFUSAL TO REGISTER THE
MOTOR VEHICLE; AND
3. MAY RESULT IN THE SUSPENSION OF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE REGISTRATION.
(2) THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY POLICE FORCE
OR ITS CONTRACTOR MAY MAIL A WARNING NOTICE INSTEAD OF A CITATION TO AN
OWNER ALLEGED TO BE LIABLE UNDER SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 1614 13
(3) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (G)(4) OF THIS SECTION,
THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY POLICE FORCE OR ITS
CONTRACTOR MAY NOT MAIL A CITATION TO A PERSON WHO IS NOT AN OWNER.
(4) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (G)(4) OF THIS SECTION, A
CITATION ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE MAILED NOT LATER THAN 2
WEEKS AFTER THE ALLEGED VIOLATION IF THE VEHICLE IS REGISTERED IN THIS
STATE, AND NOT LATER THAN 30 DAYS AFTER THE ALLEGED VIOLATION IF THE
VEHICLE IS REGISTERED IN ANOTHER STATE.
(5) TO MAIL THE CITATION OR WARNING NOTICE, THE MARYLAND
TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY POLICE FORCE OR ITS CONTRACTOR SHALL USE:
(I) THE CURRENT MAILING ADDRESS ON FILE WITH THE
ADMINISTRATION; OR
(II) IF A MAILING ADDRESS IS UNAVAILABLE, THE CURRENT
RESIDENTIAL ADDRESS ON FILE WITH THE ADMINISTRATION.
(6) A PERSON WHO RECEIVES A CITATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION MAY:
(I) PAY THE CIVIL PENALTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH
INSTRUCTIONS ON THE CITATION; OR
(II) ELECT TO STAND TRIAL IN THE DISTRICT COURT FOR THE
ALLEGED VIOLATION.
(F) (1) A CERTIFICATE ALLEGING THAT THE VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE OCCURRED AND THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS
SECTION HAVE BEEN SATISFIED, SWORN TO, OR AFFIRMED BY A MARYLAND
TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY POLICE OFFICER REPRESENTATIVE OR
CONTRACTOR, BASED ON INSPECTION OF RECORDED IMAGES PRODUCED BY A LANE
DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM, SHALL BE EVIDENCE OF
THE FACTS CONTAINED IN THE CERTIFICATE AND SHALL BE ADMISSIBLE IN A
PROCEEDING ALLEGING A VIOLATION UNDER THIS SECTION WITHOUT THE
PRESENCE OR TESTIMONY OF THE LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL
MONITORING SYSTEM OPERATOR WHO PERFORMED THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION.
(2) IF A PERSON WHO RECEIVED A CITATION UNDER SUBSECTION (E)
OF THIS SECTION DESIRES A LANE DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING
SYSTEM OPERATOR TO BE PRESENT AND TESTIFY AT TRIAL, THE PERSON SHALL

HOUSE BILL 1614
NOTIFY THE COURT AND THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY POLICE
FORCE IN WRITING NOT LATER THAN 20 DAYS BEFORE TRIAL.
(3) ADJUDICATION OF LIABILITY SHALL BE BASED ON A
PREPONDERANCE OF EVIDENCE.
(G) (1) THE DISTRICT COURT MAY CONSIDER IN DEFENSE OF A
VIOLATION:
(I) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THAT
THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR THE REGISTRATION PLATES OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE WERE
STOLEN BEFORE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED AND WERE NOT UNDER THE CONTROL
OR POSSESSION OF THE VEHICLE OWNER AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION;
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
EVIDENCE THAT THE PERSON NAMED IN THE CITATION WAS NOT OPERATING THE
VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION; AND
(III) ANY OTHER ISSUES AND EVIDENCE THAT THE DISTRICT
COURT DEEMS PERTINENT.
(2) TO DEMONSTRATE THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR THE
REGISTRATION PLATES WERE STOLEN BEFORE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED AND
WERE NOT UNDER THE CONTROL OR POSSESSION OF THE OWNER AT THE TIME OF
THE VIOLATION, THE OWNER SHALL SUBMIT PROOF THAT A POLICE REPORT
REGARDING THE STOLEN MOTOR VEHICLE OR REGISTRATION PLATES WAS FILED IN
A TIMELY MANNER.
(3) TO SATISFY THE EVIDENTIARY BURDEN UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PERSON NAMED IN THE CITATION SHALL PROVIDE
TO THE DISTRICT COURT A LETTER, SWORN TO OR AFFIRMED BY THE PERSON AND
MAILED BY CERTIFIED MAIL, RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED, THAT:
(I) STATES THAT THE PERSON NAMED IN THE CITATION WAS
NOT OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION; AND
(II) INCLUDES ANY OTHER CORROBORATING EVIDENCE.
(4) (I) IF THE DISTRICT COURT FINDS THAT THE PERSON NAMED
IN THE CITATION WAS NOT OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE
VIOLATION OR RECEIVES EVIDENCE UNDER PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION
IDENTIFYING THE PERSON DRIVING OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE
VIOLATION, THE CLERK OF THE COURT MAY PROVIDE TO THE MARYLAND

HOUSE BILL 1614 15
TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY POLICE FORCE A COPY OF ANY EVIDENCE
SUBSTANTIATING WHO WAS OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE
VIOLATION.
(II) ON RECEIPT OF SUBSTANTIATING EVIDENCE FROM THE
DISTRICT COURT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE MARYLAND
TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY POLICE FORCE MAY ISSUE A CITATION AS
PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION TO THE PERSON WHO THE
EVIDENCE INDICATES WAS OPERATING THE VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE
VIOLATION.
(III) ANY CITATION ISSUED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL BE MAILED NOT LATER THAN 2 WEEKS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE
EVIDENCE FROM THE DISTRICT COURT.
(H) IF A PERSON LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION DOES NOT PAY THE CIVIL
PENALTY OR CONTEST THE VIOLATION, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY:
(1) REFUSE TO REGISTER OR REREGISTER THE REGISTRATION OF
THE MOTOR VEHICLE CITED FOR THE VIOLATION; OR
(2) SUSPEND THE REGISTRATION OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE CITED FOR
THE VIOLATION.
(I) A VIOLATION FOR WHICH A CIVIL PENALTY IS IMPOSED UNDER THIS
SECTION:
(1) IS NOT A MOVING VIOLATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF ASSESSING
POINTS UNDER § 16–402 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(2) MAY NOT BE RECORDED BY THE ADMINISTRATION ON THE
DRIVING RECORD OF THE OWNER OR DRIVER OF THE VEHICLE;
(3) MAY BE TREATED AS A PARKING VIOLATION FOR PURPOSES OF §
26–305 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(4) MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED IN THE PROVISION OF MOTOR VEHICLE
INSURANCE COVERAGE.
(J) (1) IN CONSULTATION WITH THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION
AUTHORITY POLICE FORCE, THE CHIEF JUDGE OF THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL
ADOPT PROCEDURES FOR THE ISSUANCE OF CITATIONS, THE TRIAL OF CIVIL
VIOLATIONS, AND THE COLLECTION OF CIVIL PENALTIES UNDER THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 1614
(2) THE STANDARDS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR THE USE,
PROCESSING, AND DISPOSAL OF RECORDED IMAGES AND ASSOCIATED DATA
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 12–113.1 OF THIS ARTICLE APPLY TO CITATIONS ISSUED
UNDER THIS SECTION.
(K) (1) THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY POLICE FORCE
OR ITS CONTRACTOR SHALL ADMINISTER AND PROCESS CIVIL CITATIONS ISSUED
UNDER THIS SECTION IN COORDINATION WITH THE DISTRICT COURT.
(2) IF A CONTRACTOR PROVIDES, DEPLOYS, OR OPERATES A LANE
DIRECTION USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEM FOR THE MARYLAND
TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY POLICE FORCE, THE CONTRACTOR’S FEE MAY NOT
BE CONTINGENT ON THE NUMBER OF CITATIONS ISSUED OR PAID.
(L) THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY SHALL ADOPT
REGULATIONS ESTABLISHING STANDARDS AND PROCEDURES FOR LANE DIRECTION
USE CONTROL SIGNAL MONITORING SYSTEMS AUTHORIZED UNDER THIS SECTION.
26–305.
(a) The Administration may not register or transfer the registration of any vehicle
involved in a parking violation under this subtitle, a violation under any federal parking
regulation that applies to property in this State under the jurisdiction of the U.S.
government, a violation of § 21–202(h) of this article as determined under § 21–202.1 of this
article or Title 21, Subtitle 8 of this article as determined under § 21–809 or § 21–810 of
this article, A VIOLATION OF § 21–204.1 OF THIS ARTICLE AS DETERMINED UNDER §
21–1404.1 OF THIS ARTICLE, or a violation of the Illegal Dumping and Litter Control Law
under § 10–110 of the Criminal Law Article or a local law or ordinance adopted by
Baltimore City relating to the unlawful disposal of litter as determined under § 10–112 of
the Criminal Law Article, if:
(1) It is notified by a political subdivision or authorized State agency that
the person cited for the violation under this subtitle, § 21–202.1, § 21–809, or § 21–810 of
this article, or § 10–110 or § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article has failed to either:
(i) Pay the fine for the violation by the date specified in the citation;
or
(ii) File a notice of his intention to stand trial for the violation;
(2) It is notified by the District Court that a person who has elected to stand
trial for the violation under this subtitle, under § 21–202.1, § 21–809, or § 21–810 of this
article, or under § 10–110 or § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article has failed to appear for
trial; or

HOUSE BILL 1614 17
(3) It is notified by a U.S. District Court that a person cited for a violation
under a federal parking regulation:
(i) Has failed to pay the fine for the violation by the date specified
in the federal citation; or
(ii) Either has failed to file a notice of the person’s intention to stand
trial for the violation, or, if electing to stand trial, has failed to appear for trial.
26–401.
If a person is taken before a District Court commissioner or is given a traffic citation
or a civil citation under § 21–202.1, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1404.1, § 21–1414, or §
24–111.3 of this article containing a notice to appear in court, the commissioner or court
shall be one that sits within the county in which the offense allegedly was committed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the State Highway
Administration shall provide the Maryland Transportation Authority with access to the
State Highway Administration’s existing vendor contacts and processes to assist the
Maryland Transportation Authority in the planning and implementing of the use of lane
direction control signal monitoring systems under this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.